Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [127A.22] GUIDANCE ON LAW ENFORCEMENT. new text end new text begin The Office of General Counsel for the Department of Education must, in consultation with the attorney general, issue guidance to school districts and charter schools regarding schools' rights and responsibilities in relation to law enforcement actions, including immigration enforcement. The guidance must, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) address judicial warrants, administrative warrants, and probable cause; new text end new text begin (2) explain how the law applies to: new text end new text begin (i) different types of school property, including parking lots and athletic facilities; new text end new text begin (ii) facilities hosting extracurricular activities; and new text end new text begin (iii) student transportation on district-owned or contractor-owned vehicles, including along school bus routes and at school bus stops; and new text end new text begin (3) identify the source of law relied upon, including the United States or Minnesota Constitution, state or federal statute, state or federal regulation, or judicial interpretation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end